Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.28
Preemption of local law.

The Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder shall supersede and preempt any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution enacted by any political subdivision of the state regarding the regulation of any fertilizer or beneficial substance. No political subdivision shall prohibit or in any other manner regulate any matter relating to the registration, labeling, or sale of any fertilizer or beneficial substance. No political subdivision shall prohibit or in any other manner regulate any matter relating to the storage, transportation, distribution, notification of use, or use that is in addition to or in conflict with the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or otherwise limit the authority of any city or county to adopt and enforce zoning regulations or any natural resources district to enforce the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act.

Laws 2009, LB263, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 34.
March 17, 2026
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, see section 46-701.